Utah statutes.
38-11-207.   Reimbursement to the fund.
(1)  If the director disburses monies from the fund as a result of a person
licensed under Title 58, Chapter 55, Utah Construction Trades Licensing Act,
or a qualified beneficiary failing to pay qualified beneficiaries:
(a)  the division shall issue a notice of the disbursement from the fund and
the obligation to reimburse the fund to the licensee or qualified beneficiary;
and
(b)  the licensee or qualified beneficiary shall reimburse the fund within 20
days from the issuance of the notice required by Subsection (1)(a).
(2)  The notice required by Subsection (1)(a) shall meet the requirements
established by rule by the division in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3,
Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.
(3) (a)  A finding of fact in an administrative action that a payment of any
amount has been made from the fund in settlement of a claim arising from the
act, representation, transaction, or conduct of a person licensed under Title
58, Chapter 55, Utah Construction Trades Licensing Act, in violation of
Section 58-55-603 shall result in the immediate suspension of that person's
license without further compliance with Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative
Procedures Act.
(b)  The finding of fact for Subsection (3)(a) may be made in the same
administrative action as the related claim and may be included in the findings
required by Section 38-11-203.
(c)  The suspension required by Subsection (3)(a) shall remain in effect until
the person applies for reinstatement and is issued a license in accordance
with Sections 58-1-308 and 58-55-303.
